apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="linguìsti/cu__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>cu</l>        <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cos</l>       <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cus</l>       <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cas</l>       <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gu</l>        <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gus</l>       <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gos</l>       <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gas</l>       <r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="matessi__adj" c="">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 
<pardef n="de_dos__adj" c="">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 
<pardef n="chi_proveni/t__adj" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nt</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

<pardef n="cando__adv" c="p.31">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cando__rel">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guasi__preadv" c="">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bene__adv" c="p.31">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="altament/e__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="/no__adv" c="p.31">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>no</l>        <r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>non</l>       <r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nono</l>      <r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>no</l>    <r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

<e r="LR" lm="cando">    <p><l>candu</l>     <r>cando</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e lm="a ue">            <i>a<b/>ue</i><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e lm="comente">         <i>comente</i><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="comente" r="LR"><p><l>comenti</l><r>comente</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="comente" r="LR"><p><l>cumenti</l><r>comente</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="comente" r="LR"><p><l>commenti</l><r>comente</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="comente" r="LR"><p><l>cummente</l><r>comente</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e lm="comente a">       <i>comente<b/>a</i><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="comente a"><p><l>commenti<b/>a</l><r>comente<b/>a</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="comente a"><p><l>cummente<b/>a</l><r>comente<b/>a</r></p><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e lm="ue">              <i>ue</i><par n="cando__rel"/></e>
<e lm="no">              <i></i><par n="/no__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a manera coerente"><p><l>a<b/>manera<b/>coerente</l><r>in<b/>manera<b/>coerente</r></p><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a manera fortzosa"><p><l>a<b/>manera<b/>fortzosa</l><r>in<b/>manera<b/>fortzosa</r></p><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a manera linguìstica"><p><l>a<b/>manera<b/>linguìstica</l><r>in<b/>manera<b/>linguìstica</r></p><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a manera rara"><p><l>a<b/>manera<b/>rara</l><r>in<b/>manera<b/>rara</r></p><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="a sa revessa">    <i>a<b/>sa<b/>revessa</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cando">    <p><l>candu</l>     <r>cando</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="cogodina">        <i>cogodina</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="comente">         <i>comente</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="comunemente">     <i>comunement</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ecuamente">       <i>ecuament</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="etimologicamente"><i>etimologicament</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="generalmente">    <i>generalment</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in manera ùtile"> <i>in<b/>manera<b/></i><par n="ù/u"/><i>tile</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in manera illètzita"><i>in<b/>manera<b/>ill</i><par n="è/e"/><i>tzita</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in manera singulare"><i>in<b/>manera<b/>singulare</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="in ue">           <i>in<b/>ue</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="in ue" c="!LSC"><p><l>in<b/>ube</l><r>in<b/>ue</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="in ue" c="!LSC"><p><l>in<b/>uve</l><r>in<b/>ue</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="a ue">           <i>a<b/>ue</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a ue" c="!LSC"><p><l>a<b/>uve</l><r>a<b/>ue</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="in ue" c="!LSC"><p><l>inue</l> <r>in<b/>ue</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ispetzialmente">  <i>ispetzialment</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="literalmente">    <i>literalment</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="moralmente">      <i>moralment</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pagu mancu">      <i>pagu<b/>mancu</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pesadamente">     <i>pesadament</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="prezisamente"><p><l>prezisament</l><r>pretzisament</r></p><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="cantu"><i>cantu</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pro ite">         <i>pro<b/>ite</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="sigomente"><p><l>sigument</l>  <r>sigoment</r></p><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="traditzionalmente"><i>tradi</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ionalment</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="trisipilisi">     <i>trisipilisi</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ue" c="!LSC"><p><l>ube</l>     <r>ue</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ue">              <i>ue</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
<e lm="antimàfia">       <i>antim</i><par n="à/a"/><i>fia</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asiàticu">        <i>asi</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ti</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="auto-" c="prefissu"><i>auto-</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="carisicu">        <i>carisi</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dae bivu">        <i>dae<b/>bivu</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de barantasete">  <i>de<b/>barantasete</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de bintibator">   <i>de<b/>bintibator</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de bintunu">      <i>de<b/>bintunu</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de chimbantasete"><i>de<b/>chimbantasete</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de deghennoe">    <i>de<b/>deghennoe</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="de fùbalu"><i>de<b/>fùbalu</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de importu">        <i>de<b/>importu</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de noe">          <i>de<b/>noe</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de norantasete">  <i>de<b/>norantasete</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="de oe">    <i>de<b/>oe</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de otantanoe">    <i>de<b/>otantanoe</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de ses">          <i>de<b/>ses</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de sessantatrès"> <i>de<b/>sessantatr</i><par n="è/e"/><i>s</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de setantasès">   <i>de<b/>setantas</i><par n="è/e"/><i>s</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de su Rinaschimentu"><i>de<b/>su<b/>Rinaschimentu</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de tres">         <i>de<b/>tres</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="diplomàticu">     <i>diplom</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ti</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="evangèlicu">      <i>evang</i><par n="è/e"/><i>li</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="extra">           <i>extra</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glotològicu">     <i>glotol</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>gi</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="istròlicu">       <i>istr</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>li</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mègius">          <i>m</i><par n="è/e"/><i>gius</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mangiafrancu">    <i>mangiafran</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mega">            <i>mega</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nostàlgicu">      <i>nost</i><par n="à/a"/><i>lgi</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="poddincu">        <i>poddin</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="punk" c="istrangerismu"><i>punk</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sardiscu">        <i>sardis</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="telefònicu">      <i>telef</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>ni</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pirata">          <i>pirata</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bastante">        <i>bastante</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="bene`">           <i>bene</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="fin">             <i>fin</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="gai">             <i>gai</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="gasì">            <i>gasì</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="guasi">           <i>guasi</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="meda`">           <i>meda</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="post-bèllicu"><i>post-bèlli</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="meda"><i>meda</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tantu"><i>tantu</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bastante"><i>bastante</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="male"><i>male</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi provenit"><i>chi<b/>proveni</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi falat"><i>chi<b/>fala</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi bennit"><i>chi<b/>benni</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi esistit"><i>chi<b/>esisti</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi currispondet"><i>chi<b/>currisponde</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi creschet"><i>chi<b/>cresche</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi benit"><i>chi<b/>benit</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chi essistit"><i>chi<b/>essistit</i><par n="chi_proveni/t__adj"/></e>
